Hawaii statutes.
§286-119 Authority of examiner of drivers
to suspend or revoke licenses. The examiner of drivers may suspend any
driver's license without hearing when the examiner has reasonable cause to
believe that the licensee is incompetent to operate the type of motor vehicle
for which the licensee holds a license or is afflicted with mental or physical
infirmities or disabilities which would make it unsafe for the licensee to
operate a motor vehicle of the type for which the licensee is licensed. When
the examiner of drivers suspends a license under this section, the examiner
shall immediately notify the licensee and afford the licensee a hearing. After
the hearing, the examiner of drivers may rescind the suspension, or the
examiner may suspend the license for a further period or revoke the license.
Any person whose license has been suspended or revoked under this section may
appeal under section 286-129. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-119; am L
1970, c 164, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next